Utah statutes.
39-6-35.   Military court -- Oath or affirmation.

(1)  Before performing their respective duties, military judges, interpreters, members of the court, the trial counsel, the assistant trial counsel, the defense counsel, the assistant defense counsel, and court reporters shall take an oath or affirmation to perform their duties faithfully.

(2) (a)  The governor shall prescribe by regulation the oath or affirmation, the time and place of taking either of them, the manner of recording the taking, and whether the oath is taken for all cases in which these duties are to be performed or for a specific case.

(b)  The regulations may provide that an oath or affirmation to faithfully perform any of the duties under Subsection (1) except that of court reporter, be taken at any time by any judge advocate, legal officer, or other person certified as qualified or competent for the duty.  The regulations may also provide that an oath under this subsection need not again be taken at the time the judge advocate, legal officer, or other person having taken an oath under this section is detailed to that duty.

(c)  Each witness in a military court shall be examined on oath or affirmation.



Enacted by Chapter 210, 1988 General Session

